Missouri, session 2026, HB2962.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 305.510, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 305.510, to read as follows:
305.510. [1.] "The Missouri-St. Louis Metropolitan Airport Authority" is hereby
established. The authority is a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state and shall
be known as "The Missouri-St. Louis Metropolitan Airport Authority", and in that name may
sue and be sued. Actions of the authority are declared to be in the public interest and for a
public purpose, and the authority may exercise the powers herein granted or necessarily
implied for the purpose of promoting the general welfare and to provide safe and convenient
air travel and transportation to and from the greater St. Louis metropolitan area.
[2. After June 30, 1983, the general assembly shall not appropriate or expend any
state moneys for the implementation and continuation of this section or the Missouri-St. Louis
metropolitan airport authority.]
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.